North Dakota statutes. TITLE 31 Judicial Proof
CHAPTER 31-05 Depositions in Civil Actions

[Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure]

31-05-01.
When depositions may be used. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 26(d)(3), now 32(a)(3).

31-05-02.
When depositions may be taken. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 26(a), now 30(a), 31(a).

31-05-03.
Who authorized to take a deposition in this state. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 28(a).

31-05-04.
Who authorized to take a deposition out of state. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 28(a).

31-05-05.
Officers ineligible to take a deposition. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 28(c), now 28(d).

31-05-06.
Commission to take depositions in or out of state — Who may issue — When issued — Form — Interrogatories. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 31(a).

31-05-07.
Notice for taking depositions — Required when — Contents. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 30(a), now 30(b).

31-05-08.
Depositions may be taken without notice, when. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P.

31-05-09.
Time for service of notice for taking deposition. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 30(a), now 30(b).

31-05-10.
Service of notice by publication — When permitted — Method — Personal service out of state equivalent to. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 5(a).

31-05-11.
Cross-examination of unnamed deponent — Contents and service of notice for — Officers eligible to take. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 26(a), now 30(b)(c), 31(a); 30(a), now
31(a), 30(b)(c).

31-05-12.
Taking of deposition may be adjourned from day to day. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 30(a), now 30(b).

31-05-13.
Depositions to be written and subscribed by whom. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 30(e), now 30(c).

31-05-14.
Officer’s certificate to deposition — Required — Contents. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 30(f).

31-05-15.
Sealing and returning of depositions — When depositions may be opened. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 30(f).

31-05-16.
Time for filing depositions. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 30(f).

31-05-17.
Authentication of deposition. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 30(f).

31-05-18.
Introduction in evidence of deposition dependent upon showing of grounds for nonattendance of witness. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 26(d)(3), now 32(a)(3).

31-05-19.
Reading of deposition permitted by whom, when, and in which actions — Deposition considered whose evidence. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 26(d)(4), now 32(d)(3).

31-05-20.
Exceptions to depositions — When and how taken. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 30(c).

31-05-21.
Hearing on exceptions to depositions. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 30(c).

31-05-22.
Depositions for use in other states or foreign jurisdictions — Taking permitted — Taken before whom — Compelling attendance of witness. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P. 45.